Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Chapter 7. Virginia Board for People With Disabilities.

§ 51.5-31.
Board created.

There shall be a Virginia Board for People with Disabilities, responsible to the Secretary of Health and Human Resources. The Board shall be composed of 39 members, to include the head or a person designated by the head of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, Department of Education, Department of Medical Assistance Services, Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, and the Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired; one representative of the protection and advocacy entity; one representative of the university center for excellence in developmental disabilities; one representative each, to be appointed by the Governor, of a local governmental agency, a manufacturing or a retailing industry, a high-technology industry, a public transit interest, and a nongovernmental agency or group of agencies concerned with services for persons with developmental disabilities; a banking executive; one person with disabilities other than developmental disabilities; and 24 persons with developmental disabilities, parents or guardians of children with developmental disabilities, or immediate relatives or guardians of adults with mentally impairing developmental disabilities who cannot advocate for themselves. Of the last 24 persons, one-third shall be persons with developmental disabilities; one-third shall be a combination of (i) parents or guardians of children with developmental disabilities and (ii) immediate relatives or guardians of adults with mentally impairing developmental disabilities who cannot advocate for themselves; and one-third shall be a combination of (a) persons with developmental disabilities, (b) parents or guardians of children with developmental disabilities, and (c) immediate relatives or guardians of adults with mentally impairing developmental disabilities who cannot advocate for themselves. At least one person shall be either (1) an immediate relative or guardian of a person who resides in or previously resided in an institution or (2) a person with a developmental disability who previously resided in an institution. Such persons shall not be employees of the Virginia Board for People with Disabilities or “managing employees,” as defined by the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1320a-5), of any other entity that receives funds or provides services under Subtitle B of the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000 (P.L. 106-402).

Each member appointed by the Governor shall be appointed for a four-year term. Members so appointed shall be subject to removal at the pleasure of the Governor. Any vacancy other than by expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. No person appointed by the Governor shall serve for more than two successive terms.

The Board shall elect its chairman.

History.

1985, c. 421, § 51.01-31; 1989, c. 133; 1990, c. 458; 1992, c. 627; 2001, cc. 526, 546; 2003, c. 501; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2015, c. 523.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 526 and 546 are identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted the language beginning “one representative each, to be appointed by the Governor” and ending “parents or guardians of such persons” for “one representative each, of a higher education training facility, of a local governmental agency, of a manufacturing interest, of a retailing industry, of a real estate interest, of a public transit interest and of a nongovernmental agency or group concerned with services for persons with developmental disabilities, to be appointed by the Governor; two persons with disabilities other than developmental disabilities to be appointed by the Governor; two citizens from the Commonwealth at large to be appointed by the Governor; and twenty persons with developmental disabilities or the parents or guardians of such persons, to be appointed by the Governor” in the first sentence, and in the last sentence, substituted “twenty-four persons” for “twenty persons” and substituted “eight shall” for “six shall” twice.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 501, in the first paragraph, substituted “40” for “forty,” deleted “of” following “retailing industry” and “high-technology industry,” substituted “and a nongovernmental agency or group of agencies that provide” for “of a nongovernmental agency or group concerned with,” twice substituted “24” for “twenty-four,” and made minor punctuation changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” near the beginning of the second sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and in the first sentence of the first paragraph, substituted “39 members” for “40 members” and “Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Department for the Aging,” and deleted “Department of Rehabilitative Services” following “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services”; and in the second paragraph, deleted “except that of the members appointed in 1989, eight shall be appointed for a term of four years, eight shall be appointed for a term of three years, eight shall be appointed for a term of two years, and seven shall be appointed for a term of one year” from the end of the first sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 523 rewrote the section.

§ 51.5-32.
Meetings; compensation.

The Board shall meet and report at least quarterly to the Secretary of Health and Human Resources.

Members of the Board shall receive no compensation for their services. Representatives appointed by the Governor shall be paid their necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

History.

1985, c. 421, § 51.01-32.

§ 51.5-33.
Powers and duties.

The Board shall have the following powers and duties:

To advise the Secretary of Health and Human Resources and Governor on issues and problems of interest to persons with disabilities and on such other matters as either the Secretary or the Governor may request;

Beginning July 1, 2017, to submit an annual report to the Governor, through the Secretary of Health and Human Resources, that provides an in-depth assessment of at least two major service areas for people with disabilities, to be determined by the Board, that (i) includes a description of critical issues and trend analyses, (ii) identifies the needs of persons with developmental and related disabilities, (iii) evaluates the effectiveness of services provided by state-supported programs, and (iv) makes programmatic and fiscal recommendations for improving services and supports. Once every four years, the Board shall make available to the public all the service areas it intends to review over the following four years and shall ensure that each of these service areas is reviewed at least once within such period.

To serve as the State Council on Developmental Disabilities for the administration of certain federal public health and welfare laws as provided in 42 U.S.C. § 15001;

To perform all duties and exercise all powers designated by federal law for such state councils on developmental disabilities, including the responsibility for planning activities on behalf of all developmentally disabled persons in the Commonwealth; for receiving, accounting for and disbursing federal funds; for developing and approving the state plan; and for monitoring and evaluating the implementation of such plan for the provision of services and facilities for persons with developmental disabilities;

To be responsible for obtaining information and data from within the Commonwealth, and from time to time, but not less than annually, to review and evaluate the state plan and submit such state plan, and revisions thereto, to the Governor and to the U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services;

To hire and supervise the Director of the Board and prescribe his duties, including:

Hiring such staff and obtaining the service of such professional, technical, and clerical personnel necessary to carry out the Board’s powers and duties; and

Accepting gifts and grants on behalf of the Commonwealth, in furtherance of the purpose of this Board.

History.

1985, c. 421, § 51.01-33; 1990, c. 458; 1992, c. 627; 1995, c. 34; 2009, c. 516; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2015, c. 523; 2016, c. 219.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 516, in subdivision 2, substituted “every three years” for “biennially” near the beginning, “three years” for “biennium” near the middle and “triennial” for “biennial” near the end.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and deleted subsection 3, which read: “To initiate the development of the plan of cooperation required by §

51.5-2

” and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and in present subsection 3, deleted “of Title 42 of the United States Code” from the end.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 523 substituted “Council on Developmental Disabilities” for “Planning Council” and “15001” for “6000” in subdivision 3; substituted “councils on developmental disabilities” for “planning councils” in subdivision 4; in subdivision 6, substituted “hire” for “appoint” and inserted “including”; redesignated former subdivisions 7 and 8 as subdivisions 6 a and 6 b; substituted “Hiring such staff and obtaining” for “To hire such staff and obtain,” “the Board’s” for “its” in subdivision 6 a and substituted “Accepting” for “To accept” in subdivision 6 b.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 219 rewrote subdivision 2, which read “To submit every three years to the Governor, through the Secretary of Health and Human Resources, an assessment of the needs of persons with disabilities in the Commonwealth, the success in the preceding three years of the state agencies in meeting those needs, programmatic and fiscal recommendations for improving the delivery of services to persons with disabilities, and an assessment of the triennial economic cost and benefit to the Commonwealth of the services and rights afforded persons with disabilities as established in this title.”

§ 51.5-34.
Repealed by Acts 1995, c. 34, cl. 2.

§ 51.5-35.
Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 627.

§ 51.5-35.1.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 123, cl. 1.

Editor’s note.

Former
§

51.5-35.1

, pertained to references to Board for Rights of the Disabled and Board for the Rights of Virginians with Disabilities, was derived from
1990, c. 458; 1992, c. 627.